North Dakota, session 69, HB1003.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. The funds provided in this section, or so much of the funds as may
be necessary, are appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, and from other funds derived from special funds and federal funds, to the
attorney general for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the attorney general, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Salaries and wages $53,007,980 $8,323,325 $61,331,305
New and vacant FTE pool 0 5,140,711 5,140,711
Operating expenses 17,579,264 (988,610) 16,590,654
Prosecution witness fees 0 360,056 360,056
Capital assets 606,000 1,391,280 1,997,280
Grants 3,903,440 0 3,903,440
Human trafficking victims grants 1,110,614 1,341,900 2,452,514
Forensic nurse examiners grants 252,676 1,568 254,244
Statewide litigation funding pool 0 5,000,000 5,000,000
Litigation fees 127,500 0 127,500
Medical examinations 660,000 0 660,000
Children's forensic interviews 304,560 0 304,560
North Dakota lottery 5,413,453 171,709 5,585,162
Arrest and return of fugitives 8,500 0 8,500
Gaming commission 7,489 0 7,489
Criminal justice information sharing 4,579,950 2,749,467 7,329,417
Law enforcement 3,377,659 291,739 3,669,398
Total all funds $90,939,085 $23,783,145 $114,722,230
Less other funds 41,914,820 9,888,474 51,803,294
Total general fund $49,024,265 $13,894,671 $62,918,936
Full-time equivalent positions 266.00 4.00 270.00
SECTION 2. ONE-TIME FUNDING - EFFECT ON BASE BUDGET - REPORT TO SEVENTIETH
LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY. The following amounts reflect the one-time funding items included in the
appropriation in section 1 of this Act which are not included in the entity's base budget for the 2027-29
biennium and which the entity shall report to the appropriations committees of the seventieth legislative
assembly regarding the use of this funding:
One-Time Funding Description General Fund Other Funds Total
Bureau of criminal investigation equipment $161,000 $0 $161,000
Laboratory equipment and supplies 400,000 554,000 954,000
Network switches 32,000 0 32,000
Undercover vehicles 0 540,000 540,000
Portable handheld radios 0 105,000 105,000

H. B. NO. 1003 - PAGE 2
Intoxilyzers 0 188,000 188,000
Human trafficking victims grants 650,000 0 650,000
Statewide litigation funding pool 0 5,000,000 5,000,000
Jail management system replacement 650,000 0 650,000
Statewide automated victim identification 0 1,500,000 1,500,000
notification system replacement
Total $1,893,000 $7,887,000 $9,780,000
SECTION 3. NEW AND VACANT FTE POOL - LIMITATION - TRANSFER REQUEST. The
attorney general may not spend funds appropriated in the new and vacant FTE pool line item in
section 1 of this Act, but may request the office of management and budget to transfer funds from the
new and vacant FTE pool line item to the salaries and wages line item and other line items with salaries
and wages in accordance with the guidelines and reporting provisions included in House Bill No. 1015,
as approved by the sixty-ninth legislative assembly.
SECTION 4. ADDITIONAL INCOME - APPROPRIATION - ONE-TIME FUNDING - REPORT. In
addition to the amounts appropriated to the attorney general in section 1 of this Act, there is
appropriated from federal or special funds, the sum of $250,000, or so much of the sum as may be
necessary, to the attorney general for the purposes of defraying the expenses of the office, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The attorney general shall notify the office
of management and budget and the legislative council of any funding made available pursuant to this
section. The appropriation in this section is considered a one-time funding item.
SECTION 5. OTHER FUNDS - TRANSFER - COMMUNITY HEALTH TRUST FUND TO
ATTORNEY GENERAL OPERATING FUND. The other funds line item in section 1 of this Act includes
the sum of $239,716 from the community health trust fund which the office of management and budget
shall transfer to the attorney general operating fund for defraying expenses related to the enforcement
of the master settlement agreement and consent agreement and any disputes with the agreement
during the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
SECTION 6. OTHER FUNDS - STRATEGIC INVESTMENT AND IMPROVEMENTS FUND
TRANSFER - STATEWIDE LITIGATION FUNDING POOL TO STATE AGENCIES. The other funds line
item in section 1 of this Act includes the sum of $7,466,000 from the strategic investment and
improvements fund, of which $321,000 is for state crime laboratory equipment and supplies, $540,000
is for the replacement of bureau of criminal investigation undercover vehicles, $105,000 is for portable
handheld dual-band radios, $5,000,000 is for the statewide litigation funding pool, and $1,500,000 is for
the replacement of the statewide automated victim identification notification system. The attorney
general shall transfer funding from the statewide litigation funding pool to eligible state agencies for
litigation expenses during the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The attorney
general may not use funding from the statewide litigation funding pool to pay judgments under section
32-12-04.
SECTION 7. HUMAN TRAFFICKING VICTIMS GRANT PROGRAM - REQUIREMENTS -
REPORTS. The human trafficking victims grants line item in section 1 of this Act includes $2,452,514
from the general fund for the purpose of providing grants to organizations involved in providing
prevention and treatment services related to human trafficking victims and related administrative costs,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The attorney general may provide
grants for the development and implementation of direct care emergency or long-term crisis services,
residential care, training for law enforcement, support of advocacy services, and programs promoting
positive outcomes for victims. Any organization that receives a grant under this section shall report to
the attorney general and the appropriations committees of the seventieth legislative assembly on the
use of the funds received and the outcomes of its programs. The attorney general shall report to the
legislative management during the 2025-26 interim on the status and results of the grant program.
SECTION 8. FORENSIC NURSE EXAMINERS GRANT PROGRAM - REPORTS. The forensic
nurse examiners grants line item in section 1 of this Act includes $254,244 from the general fund for the
purpose of providing forensic nurse examiner program grants for community-based or hospital-based

H. B. NO. 1003 - PAGE 3
sexual assault examiner programs and related administrative costs, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2025, and ending June 30, 2027. Any organization that receives a grant under this section shall report
to the attorney general and the appropriations committees of the seventieth legislative assembly on the
use of the funds received and the outcomes of its programs. The attorney general shall report to the
appropriations committees of the seventieth legislative assembly on the number of nurses trained, the
number and location of nurses providing services related to sexual assault nurse examiner programs,
and documentation of collaborative efforts to assist victims which includes nurses, the hospital or clinic,
law enforcement, and state's attorneys.
SECTION 9. BUREAU OF CRIMINAL INVESTIGATION CYBER CRIME RESOURCES. The
salaries and wages line item, operating expenses line item, and capital assets line item in section 1 of
this Act includes the sum of $825,000 from the general fund for the purpose of hiring two full-time
equivalent bureau of criminal investigation cyber crime agent positions and for related equipment and
capital asset costs. The personnel hired and resources purchased pursuant to this section must be
dedicated to assisting a police department in a city in northeastern North Dakota with at least 50,000
residents with the prevention and detection of cyber crime.
SECTION 10. AMENDMENT. Section 31-01-16 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
31-01-16. Compensation and mileage and travel expense of witness.
1. A witness in a civil or criminal case is entitled to receive:
1. a. A sum of twenty-five dollars for each day necessarily in attendance before the district
court or before any other board or tribunal, except municipal court.
2. b. A sum for mileage and travel expense reimbursement equal to the reimbursement rates
provided for state employees in sections 44-08-04 and 54-06-09.
2. In all criminal cases in district court, the attorney general shall pay prosecution witness fees
and expenses, in an amount not to exceed twenty-five thousandthirty thousand dollars per
county per biennium, and the commission on legal counsel for indigents shall pay witness fees
and expenses for witnesses in those cases in which counsel has been provided by the
commission. Prisoners may not be compensated as witnesses under this section. If a county
exceeds the thirty thousand dollar reimbursement during a biennium, the county may enter an
agreement with another county to allow the county to receive another county's unused
reimbursement funds for that biennium, with the approval of the attorney general.
SECTION 11. AMENDMENT. Section 54-12-11 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-12-11. Salary of attorney general.
The annual salary of the attorney general is one hundred seventy-nine thousand three hundred
twelve one hundred ninety - two thousand seventy - nine dollars through June 30, 20242026, and one
hundred eighty-six thousand four hundred eighty-four one hundred ninety - seven thousand eight hundred
forty - one dollars thereafter.
SECTION 12. AMENDMENT. Section 54-12-30 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-12-30. Twenty-four seven sobriety program fees.
A criminal justice agency may collect program fees from offenders participating in the twenty-four
seven sobriety program, including fees for twice per day breath alcohol testing, urine testing, drug patch
testing, installation and deactivation fees for remote electronic alcohol monitoring devices, and remote
electronic alcohol monitoring daily fees. A district court judge or judicial referee may not waive program

H. B. NO. 1003 - PAGE 4
fees for offenders participating in the twenty - four seven sobriety program . The criminal justice agency
shall pay all program fees into the general fund of the governing body. The fees may only be applied to
twenty-four seven sobriety program support services, equipment maintenance and replacement, and
compliance with the program. The governing body shall pay any daily fees collected for remote
electronic alcohol monitoring to the twenty-four seven sobriety program fund.
SECTION 13. AMENDMENT. Section 54-27-25 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-27-25. Tobacco settlement trust fund - Interest on fund - Uses.
There is created in the state treasury a tobacco settlement trust fund. The fund consists of the
tobacco settlement dollars obtained by the state under subsection IX(c)(1) of the master settlement
agreement and consent agreement adopted by the east central judicial district court in its judgment
entered December 28, 1998 [Civil No. 98-3778] in State of North Dakota, ex rel. Heidi Heitkamp v.
Philip Morris, Inc. Moneys received by the state under subsection IX(c)(1) must be deposited in the
fund. Moneys in the fund must be transferred within thirty days of receipt by the state to a community
health trust fund. Moneys in the fund may be appropriated for community-based public health programs
and other public health programs, including programs with emphasis on preventing or reducing tobacco
usage in this state, and for the enforcement of the master settlement agreement and consent
agreement and any disputes with the agreement.
SECTION 14. CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECKS - FEES. Any individual or entity requesting
a criminal history record check from the bureau of criminal investigation, as a result of legislation
enacted by the sixty-ninth legislative assembly, shall pay a reasonable fee established by the attorney
general to the attorney general to be deposited in the general fund, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
SECTION 15. EXEMPTION - CONTINGENT FEE ARRANGEMENT. Notwithstanding section
54-12-08.1, the attorney general may contract for legal services compensated by a contingent fee
arrangement for ongoing multistate technology litigation during the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,
and ending June 30, 2027.
SECTION 16. EXEMPTION - ATTORNEY GENERAL REFUND FUND. Notwithstanding section
54-12-18, the attorney general may retain the balance in the attorney general refund fund which would
otherwise be transferred to the general fund on June 30, 2025.
SECTION 17. EXEMPTION - UNEXPENDED APPROPRIATIONS. The following appropriations are
not subject to the provisions of section 54-44.1-11 and may be continued into the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027:
1. The amount appropriated to the attorney general from other funds for the statewide automated
victim identification and notification system as contained in sections 1 and 8 of chapter 3 of the
2017 Session Laws, continued into the 2019-21 biennium for the statewide automated victim
identification and notification system, and continued into the 2021-23 biennium and 2023-25
biennium for the legal case management system in section 17 of chapter 35 of the 2023
Session Laws.
2. The sum of $400,000 appropriated from the attorney general refund fund for the criminal
history improvement project in section 1 of chapter 3 of the 2021 Session Laws, and continued
into the 2023-25 biennium in section 18 of chapter 35 of the 2023 Session Laws.
3. The sum of $1,000,000 appropriated from the federal state fiscal recovery fund for the
replacement of the prosecuting case management system in subsection 20 of section 1 of
chapter 550 of the 2021 Special Session Session Laws and continued into the 2023-25
biennium in section 21 of chapter 35 of the 2023 Session Laws.

H. B. NO. 1003 - PAGE 5
4. The sum of $736,000 appropriated from the charitable gaming operating fund for the
charitable gaming technology system in section 1 of chapter 35 of the 2023 Session Laws.
5. The sum of $177,000 appropriated from the general fund for a licensing and deposit software
system in section 1 of chapter 35 of the 2023 Session Laws.
6. The sum of $1,772,038 appropriated from federal funds for the justice community oriented
policing services anti-methamphetamine program in section 1 of chapter 35 of the 2023
Session Laws.
SECTION 18. EXEMPTION - STATEWIDE LITIGATION FUNDING POOL. The sum of $3,000,000
appropriated from the general fund as a deficiency appropriation for the statewide litigation funding pool
during the 2023-25 biennium, as approved by the sixty-ninth legislative assembly in House Bill
No. 1024, is not subject to section 54-44.1-11 and any unexpended funds may be continued into the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.

H. B. NO. 1003 - PAGE 6
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1003.
House Vote: Yeas 74 Nays 12 Absent 8
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 2 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State